Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-398
Bonds; levy of tax.

In any county which has issued bonds pursuant to section 23-397, the county board shall levy annually upon all the taxable property in such county a tax sufficient to pay the interest and principal of such bonds as the same fall due.

Laws 1982, LB 492, § 2.